Utah statutes.
78A-6-1111.   Right to counsel -- Appointment of counsel for indigent --
Cost -- Court hearing to determine compelling reason to appoint a
noncontracting attorney -- Rate of pay.
(1) (a)  The parents, guardian, custodian, and the minor, if competent, shall
be informed that they have the right to be represented by counsel at every
stage of the proceedings.  They have the right to employ counsel of their own
choice and if any of them requests an attorney and is found by the court to be
indigent, counsel shall be appointed by the court as provided in Subsection
(3).  The court may appoint counsel without a request if it considers
representation by counsel necessary to protect the interest of the minor or of
other parties.
(b)  The cost of appointed counsel for an indigent minor or other indigent
party, including the cost of counsel and expense of appeal, shall be paid by
the county in which the trial court proceedings are held.  Counties may levy
and collect taxes for these purposes.
(c)  The court shall take into account the income and financial ability to
retain counsel of the parents or guardian of a child in determining the
indigency of the child.
(2)  If the state or county responsible to provide legal counsel for an
indigent under Subsection (1)(b) has arranged by contract to provide services,
the court if it has received notice or a copy of such contract shall appoint
the contracting attorney as legal counsel to represent that indigent.
(3)  In the absence of contrary contractual provisions regarding the selection
and appointment of parental defense counsel, the court shall select and
appoint the attorney or attorneys if:
(a)  the contract for indigent legal services is with multiple attorneys; or
(b)  the contract is with an additional attorney or attorneys in the event of
a conflict of interest.
(4)  If the court considers the appointment of a noncontracting attorney to
provide legal services to an indigent despite the existence of an indigent
legal services contract and the court has a copy or notice of such contract,
before the court may make the appointment, it shall:
(a)  set the matter for a hearing;
(b)  give proper notice to the attorney general and the Office of Child
Welfare Parental Defense created in Section 63A-11-103; and
(c)  make findings that there is a compelling reason to appoint a
noncontracting attorney before it may make such appointment.
(5)  The indigent's mere preference for other counsel shall not be considered
a compelling reason justifying the appointment of a noncontracting attorney.
(6)  The court may order a minor, parent, guardian, or custodian for whom
counsel is appointed and the parents or guardian of any child for whom counsel
is appointed to reimburse the county for the cost of appointed counsel.
